Hawaii statutes.
§182-6 Exploration. Any person wishing
to conduct exploration on state lands shall apply to the board of land and
natural resources who shall issue exploration permits upon terms and conditions
as it shall by regulation prescribe. During and as a result of the
exploration, no minerals of such types and quantity beyond that reasonably
required for testing and analysis shall be extracted and removed from such
state lands. Upon termination of the exploration permit, the drill logs and
the results of the assays resulting from the exploration shall be turned over
to the board and kept confidential by the board. If the person shall not make
application for a mining lease of the lands within a period of six months from
the date the information is turned over to the board, the board in its
discretion need not keep the information confidential.

This section shall be construed as authorizing
the board to issue an exploration permit for geothermal resources as well as
minerals. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-6; HRS §182-6; am L 2012, c 97,
§4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next